Washington statutes.
RCW 4.80.030

Requisites—Entry in minutes.

Exceptions to any ruling upon an objection to the admission of evidence, offered in the course of a trial or hearing, need not be formally taken, but the question put or other offer of evidence, together with the objection thereto and the ruling thereon, shall be entered by the court, judge, referee or commissioner (or by the stenographer, if one is in attendance) in the minutes of the trial or hearing, and such entry shall import an exception by the party against whom the ruling was made.

[ 1893 c 60 s 5; RRS s 385.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. CR 46.